Wyoming, session 2026, SF0027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 23-3-109(d)(intro) is amended to
read:
23-3-109. Use of dogs; dogs injuring big or trophy
game animals may be killed; citation of owners of dogs
harassing game animals; penalties; leashed dogs for
tracking.
(d) A person may use one (1) leashed blood-trailing
dog to track a wounded or killed big game animal or black
bear within seventy-two (72) hours of shooting the animal.
A person using a dog in this manner:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0027
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2